Rhode Island statutes. Title 39 Public Utilities and Carriers
Chapter 14 Taxicabs and Limited Public Motor Vehicles

39-14-1.
Definitions.

Terms used in this chapter shall be construed as follows, unless another meaning is expressed or is clearly apparent from the language or context:

“Certificate” means a certificate of public convenience and necessity issued to a common carrier.

“Common carrier” means any person who holds himself, herself, or itself out to the general public as engaging in the transportation by motor vehicle of passengers for compensation in a taxicab or in a limited public motor vehicle.

“Driver” means any person operating a motor vehicle used for the transportation of passengers which he or she owns or is operating with the expressed or implied consent of the owner.

“Limited public motor vehicle” means and includes every motor vehicle for hire, other than a jitney, as defined in §

39-13-1

, or a taxicab, as defined in this chapter, equipped with a taximeter used for transporting members of the general public for compensation only from a designated location on private property to such points as may be directed by the passenger.

“Motor carrier” means a common carrier by motor vehicle.

“Person” means and includes any individual, firm, partnership, corporation, company, association, joint stock association, or company, and his, her, or its lessee, trustee, receiver, assignee, or personal representative, and, where the context requires, “driver” as defined in this section.

“Taxicab” means and includes every motor vehicle for hire, other than a jitney as defined in §

39-13-1

, equipped with a taximeter, used for transporting members of the general public for compensation to any place within this state as may be directed by a passenger on a call-and-demand basis, when the solicitation or acceptance of the passenger occurs within the location named in the certificate; provided, that the vehicle’s driver may, if and when solicited on a public highway at any location at which he or she is discharging a passenger, which location is not shown in the certificate, provide transportation from the location only to a place named in the certificate.

“Taximeter” means any instrument or device by which the charge for transportation in any taxicab or limited public motor vehicle is mechanically calculated and indicated by means of figures, either for distances traveled or for waiting time, or for both.

“Wheelchair-accessible taxicab” means a taxicab designed and equipped to allow the transportation of a person(s) who uses a wheelchair without requiring that person(s) to be removed from the wheelchair, but the taxicab is not restricted to transporting only persons using wheelchairs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1423, § 1; P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 1; P.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-1

; P.L. 1965, ch. 193, § 1; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 16; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 116; P.L. 2007, ch. 163, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 266, § 1.

39-14-2.
Powers of division.

Every person owning or operating a motor vehicle engaged or to be engaged in operating a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle is declared a common carrier and subject as such to the jurisdiction of the division of public utilities and carriers. The division shall prescribe such rules and regulations as it shall deem proper to assure adequate, economical, safe, and efficient service at reasonable charges without unjust discrimination, undue preference or advantages, or unfair or destructive competitive practices. The division may require common carriers to prepare records and to preserve them, and to make such reports to it as shall disclose to the division the character of service rendered, the safety of equipment used, and the safety of operation, the character of the management and conduct of the common-carrier business, and its relation to and control of or by other carriers or other businesses. Upon complaint or upon his or her own initiative, the administrator may investigate or conduct a hearing as to compliance by any common carrier with the provisions of this title or regulations promulgated pursuant thereto, and shall issue orders as his or her findings shall indicate to be necessary or desirable for the public welfare. The findings of the administrator shall be reported in writing and copies thereof shall be furnished to the parties involved.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 2; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-2

; P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 16.

39-14-2.1.
Filing and availability of rate schedules.

Every taxicab or limited public motor vehicle shall file with the public utilities administrator current schedules that shall be open to public inspection, showing all rates, tolls, and charges it has established and that are in force at the time for any service performed by it within the state, or for any service in connection therewith or performed by any taxicab or limited public motor vehicle controlled or operated by it. A copy of so much of the schedules as the administrator shall deem necessary for the use of the public shall be printed in plain type or typewritten, and kept on file in every station or office of the taxicab or limited public motor vehicle, open to the public in such form and place as to be readily accessible and conveniently inspected, as the administrator may order. The administrator may determine and prescribe the form in which the schedules, required by this section to be kept open to public inspection, shall be prepared and arranged.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 499, § 1.

39-14-2.2.
Notice of change in rates.

No change shall be made in the rates, tolls, and charges that have been filed and published by any taxicab or limited public motor vehicle in compliance with the requirements of §

39-14-2.1

except after thirty (30) days’ written notice to the administrator which shall plainly state the changes proposed to be made in the schedule then in force, and the time when the changed rates, tolls, or charges will go into effect. A filing fee of fifty dollars ($50.00) shall accompany all filings made pursuant to this section. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. Whenever the administrator receives notice of any change or changes proposed to be made in any schedule filed under the provisions of §

39-14-2.1

, the administrator may hold a public hearing and make investigation as to the propriety of the proposed change or changes.

After notice of any investigation, the administrator shall have power, by any order served upon the taxicab or limited public motor vehicle affected, to suspend the taking effect of any change or changes pending the decision thereof, but not for a longer period than five (5) months beyond the time when the change or changes would otherwise take effect; provided, however, that in the event that any hearing and/or investigation shall not have been completed at the expiration of the five-month (5) period, the administrator shall have power, by an order served upon the taxicab or limited public motor vehicle affected, to further suspend the taking effect of the change or changes pending the decision thereon, but not for a longer period than three (3) months beyond the expiration of the first mentioned five-month (5) period. Each hearing and investigation shall be conducted as expeditiously as may be practicable, and with a minimum of delay. Within ninety (90) days after the completion of any hearing, the administrator shall make such order in reference to any proposed rate, toll, or charge as may be proper.

The administrator, in his or her discretion and for good cause shown, may allow the publication of rates or charges upon notice less than that specified in this section, or may modify the requirements of this section with respect to the posting and filing of tariffs, either in particular instances or by general order applicable to special or peculiar circumstances or conditions. The administrator, after a hearing, may establish from time to time such reasonable rules and regulations as he or she may deem necessary pertaining to the form of tariffs; the time and manner of filing thereof; the suspension of rates before the rates become effective; and bearing upon the validity of any filed or existing rate. No taxicab or limited public motor vehicle shall charge, demand, collect, or receive a greater or less compensation for transportation or any service in connection therewith between points enumerated in the tariff than the rates and charges specified in the filed tariffs in effect at the time.

In the event of an appeal from an order of the administrator in any hearing under this section, the order shall remain in full force and effect during the pendency of the appeal.

The administrator shall implement a gasoline price emergency surcharge program whereby a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle licensed under this chapter shall be permitted to impose and collect a surcharge, during such times and under such conditions wherein the administrator determines that the average price of gasoline in this state exceeds one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per gallon. Provided, that the administrator shall have discretion as to when to permit such surcharge to be imposed, except that the administrator shall not impose the surcharge at any time when the average price of gasoline, as determined by the administrator, does not exceed the price of one dollar and fifty cents ($1.50) per gallon.

History of Section.

P.L. 1985, ch. 499, § 1; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 7; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 116; P.L. 2001, ch. 307, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 412, § 1.

39-14-3.
Certificate required for operation — Application and fee.

No person, association, or corporation shall operate a taxicab or taxicabs or a limited public motor vehicle or vehicles in any city or town in the state until the person, association, or corporation shall have obtained a certificate from the division certifying that public convenience and necessity require the operation of a taxicab or taxicabs or a limited public motor vehicle or vehicles for transportation of passengers, the acceptance or solicitation of which originate only within the territory specified in the certificate. The certificate shall be issued only after written application for a certificate, accompanied by a fee of one hundred dollars ($100), has been made, and public hearing held thereon. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall not register any vehicle defined in this section unless the person, association, or corporation shall present evidence of certification pursuant to this section to the administrator.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 823, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-3

; P.L. 1960, ch. 71, art. 3, § 34; P.L. 1965, ch. 193, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 34, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 7; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 120; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 116.

39-14-4.
Hearing on application.

Upon receipt of an application, the division shall, within a reasonable time, fix the time and place of the hearing on every application. Notice of the hearing shall be given by first-class mail to the applicant and shall be published in a newspaper with statewide distribution.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 823, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-4

; P.L. 1965, ch. 193, § 3; P.L. 1995, ch. 151, § 1.

Parties to Applications.

Where the protestant was made a party to the hearing for issuance of taxicab certificate of authority by this section, he is an aggrieved person as provided by (former) § 39-5-9. Yellow Cab Co. v. Public Util. Hearing Bd.,

96 R.I. 247

, 191 A.2d 23,

1963 R.I. LEXIS 82

(1963).

39-14-4.1.
Issuance of certificate to a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle.

A certificate shall be issued by the administrator, after a hearing, to any qualified applicant therefor, authorizing the whole or any part of the operations covered by the application, if it is found that the applicant is fit, willing, and able properly to perform the service proposed and to conform to the provisions of this chapter and the requirements, orders, rules, and regulations of the administrator thereunder, and that the proposed service, to the extent to be authorized by the certificate, is or will be required by the present or future public convenience and necessity; otherwise the application shall be denied. Any certificate issued under this chapter shall specify the service to be rendered and, at the time of the issuance and from time to time thereafter, attached to the exercise of the privileges granted by the certificate, such reasonable terms, conditions, and limitations as the public convenience and necessity may from time to time require. Certificates issued under this chapter shall be renewed before the close of business on December 31 of each calendar year. The renewal fee shall be one hundred dollars ($100) and shall be submitted with the renewal form. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 8; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 120.

39-14-4.2.
Registration and identification of taxicabs and limited public motor vehicles.

Every taxicab and limited public motor vehicle engaged in the transportation of passengers for compensation over the highways of this state, subject to the provisions of this chapter, shall apply to the administrator for the issuance of a vehicle identification device for the registration and identification of vehicles. The application shall be accompanied by a filing fee in the amount of twenty dollars ($20.00) for each identification device for which an application is made. All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. The identification device shall be furnished annually to every carrier whose duty it shall be to apply therefor. It shall be unlawful for any taxicab or limited public motor vehicle to be engaged in transporting passengers for compensation without the owner thereof having applied for and received the required identification device, unless the vehicle is exempted from the provisions of this chapter. Each identification device shall be accompanied by a registration card issued by the administrator which shall be in the possession of the vehicle’s driver, when the vehicle is operating. Transfers of the identification device from one vehicle to another are hereby prohibited unless authorized by the administrator. The administrator, in his or her discretion, may refuse to reissue the identification device to the holder of any certificate or permit pending any complaint or hearing upon the question of revocation or suspension or in which such question is involved. The administrator shall prescribe reasonable rules and regulations governing the registration and identification of motor vehicles authorized for operation under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 8; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 120.

39-14-5.
Certification of businesses previously established.

The business of operating any limited public motor vehicle actually established in any city or town on or before February 15, 1956, and in continuous operation from that date to the date of application, shall be presumed to be required by public convenience and necessity, and certificates for operation shall be issued as a matter of right without public hearing, the provisions of §

39-14-4

notwithstanding; provided, however, that the certificates shall be limited to the number of public service registrations in effect, or for which applications were on file in the division of motor vehicles on April 27, 1956, at five o’clock (5:00) p.m. Pending the issuance of the certificates by the division, the continued operation by the applicant shall be lawful.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 7; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-5

; P.L. 1965, ch. 193, § 4.

39-14-6.
Safety and sanitary condition of vehicles — Inspection.

The division of motor vehicles shall have jurisdiction over the lighting, equipment, safety, and sanitary condition of all taxicabs or limited public motor vehicles, and shall cause an inspection thereof to be made before registering the taxicabs or limited public motor vehicles, and from time to time thereafter, as it shall deem necessary for the convenience, protection, and safety of passengers and of the public. A fee of one dollar ($1.00) shall be paid to the division of motor vehicles for each annual inspection and for each taxicab or limited public motor vehicle operator’s license hereafter issued by the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 5; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 22; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-6

.

39-14-7.
Display of certificate memorandum.

The owner or operator of each taxicab or limited public motor vehicle subject to the provisions of §§

39-14-3

and

39-14-4

, shall display, in a conspicuous place therein, a memorandum issued by the division of the certificate provided for in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 4; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 4; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-7

; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 116.

39-14-8.
Base of operations of limited public vehicles.

A limited public motor vehicle may only be operated from private property if the property is owned by the owner of the vehicle or is used exclusively for the purpose of transportation of passengers for hire and is leased by the owner of the vehicle; but no vehicle shall be operated from any taxicab stand on any public highway; nor shall the operator thereof transport any passenger for hire unless the transportation is requested by the passenger at an office of the owner of the vehicle, either personally or by telephone.

History of Section.

G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-8

.

39-14-9.
Vehicles to be operated by owner or employee — Assignment or lease of rights.

Every person proposing to enter into a contract, agreement, arrangement, or understanding, whereby the owner of a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle leases or otherwise lets a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle to an operator, shall file with the administrator, in the form to be provided by him or her, an application for approval of the agreement. The division shall, upon written application setting forth the purpose, terms, and conditions of the lease agreement, after investigation, approve or deny the request. The lease agreement shall be approved by the administrator if, after investigation, the applicant operator is found to be fit, willing, and able to perform the authorized service and to conform to the provisions of this chapter and the requirements, orders, rules, and regulations of the administrator thereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 9; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-9

; P.L. 1978, ch. 396, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 215, § 1; P.L. 2015, ch. 234, § 1.

39-14-10.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 3; P.L. 1940, ch. 823, § 1; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-10

; P.L. 1965, ch. 193, § 5; Repealed by P.L. 1980, ch. 131, § 1.

39-14-11.
Penalties for violations.

Any person or the officers of any association or corporation who shall violate any provision of §§

39-14-1

—

39-14-17

,

39-14-20(b)

,

39-14-25

and

39-14-26

, or any order, rule, or regulation adopted or established under any provision, shall be fined not more than one hundred dollars ($100) or imprisoned not more than sixty (60) days or both, and his or her certificate may be revoked, and the violation shall be a separate and distinct offense for each day during which it shall continue.

The administrator may, in his or her discretion, in addition to seeking criminal sanctions, impose upon its regulated taxicabs and limited public motor vehicles an administrative civil penalty (fine) in addition to revoking or suspending the taxicab’s and limited public motor vehicle’s operating authority as conferred under this chapter. The fine shall not exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) per each violation of the sections contained in this chapter or the division’s orders, rules, and regulations issued and promulgated thereunder.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 6; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-11

; P.L. 1980, ch. 131, § 3; P.L. 2000, ch. 203, § 1; P.L. 2003, ch. 423, § 1.

39-14-12.
Administrative powers.

The division is authorized to make such rules and regulations, to hold hearings, and issue certificates as may be required under the provisions of §§

39-14-1

—

39-14-14

and §§

39-14-25

and

39-14-26

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 8; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-12

; P.L. 1980, ch. 131, § 3.

39-14-13.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 10; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-13

; P.L. 1965, ch. 193, § 6; Repealed by P.L. 1969, ch. 240, § 18.

39-14-14.
Provisions supplemental — Powers of cities and towns.

The provisions of §§

39-14-1

—

39-14-14

are hereby declared to be supplementary and in addition to the provisions of other chapters of this title, and of title 31, and of §§

39-14-1

5 —

39-14-23

. The cities and towns may continue to exercise by ordinance all lawful authority heretofore exercised by them, not inconsistent with the express provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 11; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 11; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-14

.

39-14-14.1.
Taximeter requirement.

Every motor vehicle used in the transportation of passengers for compensation in a taxicab service over the publicly used highways of this state shall be equipped with a taximeter. Any motor carrier or operator who shall knowingly and willfully cause a motor vehicle to be operated as a taxicab that is not equipped with a taximeter, or when so equipped the taximeter is not in a recording position for the purpose of registering charges at the time the service is rendered, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall, upon conviction thereof, be fined not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25.00) for the first offense; and, upon conviction for a second offense, shall be fined not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) and shall have his or her certificate suspended for a period not to exceed thirty (30) days; and, upon conviction for a third offense, shall be fined not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) and shall have his or her certificate suspended for a period not to exceed one hundred eighty (180) days.

A certificate holder authorized to provide taxicab services is not required to utilize the vehicle’s taximeter for registering charges when the transportation services are being coordinated by, and paid for by, a state department, authority, or agency on behalf of clients of the state department, authority, or agency, provided, the alternative method for registering or calculating charges is approved by the division.

History of Section.

P.L. 1973, ch. 201, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 252, § 1; P.L. 2014, ch. 306, § 1.

39-14-15.
Posting of photograph of operator.

The operator of every taxicab or limited public motor vehicle shall have a recent and distinct photograph of himself or herself at least two and one-half inches (21/2") wide and four inches (4") high, together with his or her full name and address, posted in a conspicuous place in the taxicab or limited public motor vehicle operated by him or her.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1423, § 2; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 2; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-15

.

39-14-16.
Posting of schedule of fares.

The owner of every taxicab or limited public motor vehicle shall post in a conspicuous place, in each of the taxicabs or limited public motor vehicles owned by him or her, a schedule of the fares to be collected from the passengers therein, and the schedule shall be so written and arranged that the passengers can readily determine the exact fare payable by them, and it shall be unlawful to collect any fare otherwise than as appearing on and determinable from the schedule.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1423, § 3; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 3; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-16

.

39-14-17.
Display of name of owner — Operator as agent.

The full name of the owner of every taxicab or limited public motor vehicle shall be displayed on each side of the rear doors of the taxicab or limited public motor vehicle in letters at least two inches (2") high and whenever any taxicab or limited public motor vehicle shall be used or operated upon any public highway of this state with the consent of the owner, express or implied, or under any agreement with the owner, express or implied, the operator thereof, if other than the owner, shall, in case of accident, be deemed to be the agent of the owner.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1423, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 5; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 4; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-17

.

39-14-18.
Proof of financial responsibility.

The owner of every taxicab or limited public motor vehicle shall, before operating or continuing to operate a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle on the public highways of this state, furnish to the division of public utilities and carriers, a certificate of insurance issued by an insurance company authorized to transact business in this state, showing that the owner has a policy insuring him or her against liability for injury to persons and damage to property that may be caused by the operation of the taxicab or limited public motor vehicle, such policy to provide for indemnity in the sum of not less than three hundred thousand dollars ($300,000) combined, single limit, or two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) per person, five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per accident bodily injury and one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) property damage split limit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1423, § 6; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 6; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 5; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-18

; P.L. 1968, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 140, § 18; P.L. 1981, ch. 194, § 1; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 116; P.L. 2006, ch. 579, § 1.

39-14-19.
Owners exempt from other financial responsibility requirements.

No owner of a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle, who shall have complied with the requirements of §

39-14-18

, shall be required to furnish evidence of financial responsibility under any other provision of law with respect to the taxicab or limited public motor vehicle.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 12; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 12; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-19

.

39-14-20.
Licensing of operators.

No person shall operate a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle upon the public highways until the person shall have first obtained an operator’s license as provided for in chapter 10 of title 31.

Further, no person shall operate a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle upon the highways until the person shall have first obtained a special license from the division of public utilities and carriers under such rules and regulations as the division of public utilities and carriers shall require.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1423, § 7; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 7; impl. am. P.L. 1939, ch. 660, § 22; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 6; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-20

; P.L. 2003, ch. 423, § 1.

39-14-21.
Penalty for violations.

Any person, firm, or corporation violating any of the provisions of §§

39-14-18

—

39-14-20(a)

shall, upon conviction, be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) nor more than two hundred dollars ($200) for each violation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1423, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 9; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 8; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-21

; P.L. 2003, ch. 423, § 1.

39-14-22.
Enforcement of provisions.

The administrator of the division of motor vehicles shall enforce the provisions of §§

39-14-18

,

39-14-19

,

39-14-20(a)

, and

39-14-21

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1935, ch. 2250, § 75; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 10; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 9; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-22

; P.L. 2003, ch. 423, § 1; P.L. 2020, ch. 79, art. 1, § 7.

39-14-23.
Persons exempt.

The provisions of this chapter shall not apply to any citizen of the town of New Shoreham owning or operating a taxicab or limited public motor vehicle in the town of New Shoreham.

History of Section.

P.L. 1929, ch. 1423, § 8; P.L. 1931, ch. 1716; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 8; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 7; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-23

; P.L. 1994, ch. 367 § 1; P.L. 1995, ch. 318, § 1.

39-14-24.
Severability.

Each section of this chapter and each part of each section is hereby declared to be an independent section, and the holding of any section or sections or part or parts thereof to be void, ineffective, or unconstitutional, for any cause, shall not be deemed to affect any other section or part thereof.

History of Section.

P.L. 1930, ch. 1552, § 13; G.L. 1938, ch. 100, § 13; P.L. 1956, ch. 3829, § 1; G.L. 1938, ch. 101, § 9; P.L. 1956, ch. 3830, § 1; G.L. 1956, §

39-14-24

.

39-14-25.
Transfer of certificate.

No certificate shall be sold or transferred until the administrator, upon written application setting forth the purposes, terms, and conditions of the sale or transfer, shall, after a hearing, approve the application. The application shall be accompanied by a fee of two hundred and fifty dollars ($250). All revenues received under this section shall be deposited as general revenues. A proposed transfer of a certificate shall be approved only if the administrator finds the transferee to be fit, willing, and able, financially and otherwise, to render the service described and authorized in the certificate; further, the administrator shall only reissue and transfer a certificate upon evidence that the transferor of the certificate has, during the six-month (6) period immediately prior to receipt of the transfer application, or during the six-month (6) period immediately preceding the filing of a petition for bankruptcy, whether voluntary or involuntary, or the institution of a petition for receivership, wherein the certificates are assets of the bankruptcy or receivership, been rendering the service authorized by the certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 131, § 2; P.L. 1986, ch. 34, § 2; P.L. 1992, ch. 133, art. 34, § 7; P.L. 1995, ch. 370, art. 40, § 120; P.L. 2007, ch. 73, art. 26, § 4; P.L. 2007, ch. 485, § 4.

39-14-26.
Revocation or amendment of certificate.

Any taxi or limited public motor vehicle certificate holder who, during any period of not less than one hundred eighty (180) consecutive days, has failed to render any part of the service authorized by his or her certificate, except for reasonable cause, including bankruptcy, receivership, or other trustee proceedings, shall be deemed to have abandoned that part of the service; and if, after a hearing, the administrator finds the certificate holder has failed to render service in accordance with the certificate, his or her rights thereto to the extent of his or her failure to render service shall be revoked. The administrator may, for sufficient cause shown after a public hearing, amend, suspend, or revoke any certificate issued under this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1980, ch. 131, § 2; P.L. 1997, ch. 326, § 116; P.L. 2013, ch. 306, § 1; P.L. 2013, ch. 377, § 1.